Georgia, session 2025_26, HB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-3-519.2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to eligibility
requirements for a HOPE scholarship and award amount, is amended by revising
subsection (d) as follows:
"(d) A student may receive the HOPE scholarship until the first of these events:
H. B. 385 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 61 0187S
(1)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the The student has
earned a baccalaureate or first professional degree;.
(B)(i) Subject to division (ii) of this subparagraph, the provisions of subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph shall not apply to any student:
(I) Who continuously meets the achievement standards provided for in this Code
section while concurrently seeking both a baccalaureate degree and a first
professional degree; or
(II) Who continuously met the achievement standards provided for in this Code
section while earning a baccalaureate degree and who, within 18 months of earning
such degree, commences a graduate program at an eligible postsecondary
institution, provided that he or she continuously meets such achievement standards.
(ii) Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 20-2-161.3 to the contrary, the
number of hours for which a student is eligible to receive the HOPE scholarship for
a first professional degree under division (i) of this subparagraph shall be reduced by
the number of hours for which such student received credit for completing one or
more postsecondary courses while participating in the dual enrollment program
provided for in Code Section 20-2-161.3 if the cost of such postsecondary courses
was paid for using state funds pursuant to such program;
(2) The student has attempted at any postsecondary institution a total of 190 quarter
hours or 127 semester hours; or
(3) For those students receiving a HOPE scholarship for the first time between July 1,
2011, and June 30, 2019, seven years from a student's graduation from high school or the
equivalent thereof as determined by the Georgia Student Finance Commission in its rules
and regulations; provided, however, that, for a student who serves in the military during
such seven-year period, any such active duty military service shall not count against the
seven-year period nor constitute a failure to be enrolled. For those students receiving a
HOPE scholarship for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, ten years from a student's
H. B. 385 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 61 0187S
graduation from high school or the equivalent thereof as determined by the Georgia
Student Finance Commission in its rules and regulations; provided, however, that, for a
student who serves in the military during such ten-year period, any such active duty
military service shall not count against the ten-year period nor constitute a failure to be
enrolled. Any full-time or part-time student receiving a HOPE scholarship and enrolled
in an eligible postsecondary institution after June 30, 2019, shall remain eligible for a
HOPE scholarship pursuant to this paragraph, provided that such student meets all other
eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, those set forth in paragraphs (1)
and (2) of this subsection. Students with a disability, as defined in the federal Americans
with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12102, which prevents or substantially inhibits
full-time academic study, may apply to the Georgia Student Finance Commission for a
limited waiver from the applicable year limit set forth in this paragraph and request
additional time to complete the first to occur of the events set forth in paragraphs (1)
and (2) of this subsection. Such application for a limited waiver shall be considered and
determined by the Georgia Student Finance Commission in accordance with its rules and
regulations."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply beginning with the
2026-2027 academic year.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 385 (SUB)
- 3 -